Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2636
Family Child Care Home Grant Program; department; report; contents.

The department shall submit a report to the Legislature electronically on July 1, 2025, and each July 1 thereafter. Each report shall include the following:

(1) For each grant awarded under the Family Child Care Home Grant Program since July 19, 2024, for the first such report and since the most recent report under this section for each subsequent report:

(a) The name of the grant recipient;

(b) The amount of the grant;

(c) The reason the grant was requested and how the money was used by the grant recipient; and

(d) The number, age, and county location of any children served through a valid use of a grant described under section 43-2635;

(2) The total amount of money awarded as grants and the total number of children served under subdivision (1) of this section;

(3) A compilation of ages and county locations of all children served through a valid use of a grant described under section 43-2635;

(4) Administrative costs of the department to administer the Family Child Care Home Grant Program; and

(5) Any other information the department deems relevant to the Family Child Care Home Grant Program.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 40.